Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-422
Long-term care hospital, defined.

Long-term care hospital means a hospital or any distinct part of a hospital that provides the care and services of an intermediate care facility, a nursing facility, or a skilled nursing facility.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 22.